Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-129
Governor; disability; conference; member; unable to perform duty; successor.

Should any of the officials named as members of the conference provided for in sections 84-127 and 84-128 be, for any reason, unable to perform the duties of his office, his place in such conference shall be taken by the person actually performing the duties of his office.

Laws 1961, c. 452, § 3, p. 1380.